Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1309.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Article VI of the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code, is amended by adding a subarticle heading immediately preceding section 601 to read:SUBARTICLE ALIFE PROGRAMSection 2. Article VI of the act is amended by adding a subarticle to read:SUBARTICLE BELECTRONIC MONITORING OF IN-HOME SUPPORTIVE CARESection 611. Scope of subarticle.This subarticle relates to monitoring of care recipients.Section 612. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subarticle 1234567891011121314151617181920 shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Care recipient." An individual enrolled in the LIFE program who receives in-home supportive care in the individual's home in this Commonwealth."Caregiver." An individual providing in-home supportive care to a care recipient through the LIFE program."Electronic monitoring device." A video surveillance instrument installed in the home of a care recipient receiving in-home supportive care in the care recipient's home in accordance with this subarticle, which broadcasts, photographs or records visual activity occurring in the care recipient's home."Guardian." A fiduciary who has the care and management of the estate or person of an incapacitated person under 20 Pa.C.S. Ch. 55 (relating to incapacitated persons)."Home." A residential dwelling that does not include any facility that is owned, rented, leased, operated by or licensed by the Department of Health or the department."In-home supportive care." Services provided by the LIFE program in a care recipient's home."LIFE program." As defined in section 602(d)."Unauthorized electronic monitoring device." An electronic, mechanical or other means of monitoring a wire or electronic communication that does not meet the provisions of this subarticle and is specifically used for the nonconsensual interception of wire or electronic communications.Section 613. Notification of electronic monitoring device.(a) Notification.--Before a care recipient receives in-home supportive care from a caregiver, the care recipient or the 20250HB1309PN1503 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 guardian of the care recipient shall notify the caregiver in writing whether an electronic monitoring device is present.(b) Presence.--If an electronic monitoring device is present in the care recipient's home, the care recipient or guardian of the care recipient shall notify the caregiver in writing of the following:(1) The location of the electronic monitoring device.(2) The specifics of the electronic monitoring device, including the type, function and use of the electronic monitoring device.(3) Notification of the prohibition of audio recording under 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 57 (relating to wiretapping and electronic surveillance).(4) While providing in-home supportive care, the caregiver consents to being recorded visually.(5) Notice of release from liability for privacy violation through the use of the electronic monitoring device.(6) A release from civil liability on the part of a caregiver for a violation of the care recipient's privacy rights regarding the use of the electronic monitoring device in the care recipient's home.(c) Form.--The caregiver may provide a form to the care recipient or the guardian of the care recipient to obtain the required information under subsection (b).Section 614. Restrictions.(a) Electronic monitoring device restrictions.--An electronic monitoring device in a care recipient's home may not:(1) Record audio.(2) Be placed in a bathroom.20250HB1309PN1503 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) Be obstructed.(b) Privacy and dignity.--The privacy and dignity of a care recipient should be considered when installing, moving and establishing placement of an electronic monitoring device.Section 615. Electronic monitoring device requirements.The following apply to an electronic monitoring device in a care recipient's home:(1) The electronic monitoring device shall be placed in a conspicuous location.(2) If the electronic monitoring device records activity visually, the recording shall denote the date and time.(3) Any cost incurred with the installation, maintenance or removal of an electronic monitoring device shall be the responsibility of the care recipient or guardian of the care recipient.(4) The electronic monitoring device shall have the capability to turn on and off.Section 616. Optional requirements.A caregiver may require additional information from the care recipient or the guardian of the care recipient about an electronic monitoring device in the care recipient's home.Section 617. Discrimination prohibited.A care recipient may not be denied care or be otherwise discriminated against or retaliated against for usage of an electronic monitoring device in the care recipient's home.Section 618. Notice.A care recipient or guardian of a care recipient shall post at or near the entrance of a room in the care recipient's home with an electronic monitoring device a sign that clearly states the room is being monitored by an electronic monitoring device.20250HB1309PN1503 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 619. Access to recordings or photographs.A video recording or photograph produced from an electronic monitoring device in a care recipient's home shall be considered the personal property of the care recipient and the caregiver may not access the recording or photograph without the written consent of the care recipient or the guardian of the care recipient. The following apply:(1) A person or entity that distributes material obtained from an electronic monitoring device with the intent to ridicule or demean the care recipient shall be subject to the penalties prescribed in 18 Pa.C.S. § 2713.1 (relating to abuse of care-dependent person).(2) A violation of this section shall constitute a misdemeanor of the third degree.Section 620. Prohibition of obstruction or interception.(a) Prohibition.--A person or entity may not intentionally hamper, obstruct, tamper with or destroy an electronic monitoring device installed in a care recipient's home.(b) Criminal offense.--(1) A violation of this section shall constitute a misdemeanor of the second degree.(2) A person or entity that intentionally or knowingly hampers, obstructs, tampers with or destroys a recording or an electronic monitoring device installed in a care recipient's home shall be subject to the penalties prescribed under 18 Pa.C.S. § 4910 (relating to tampering with or fabricating physical evidence) as it relates to tampering of physical evidence.(c) Interception, disclosure and use of intercepted communications.--A person or entity may not intercept a 20250HB1309PN1503 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 communication or disclose or use an intercepted communication of an electronic monitoring device placed or installed in a care recipient's home without the express written consent of the care recipient or the guardian of the care recipient.Section 621. Admissibility of evidence.(a) Unauthorized material inadmissible.--In a civil action against a care recipient or caregiver, material obtained through the use of an unauthorized electronic monitoring device shall be inadmissible as evidence.(b) Immunity.--Compliance with this section shall be a complete defense against a civil or criminal action brought against the care recipient or guardian of the care recipient for the use or presence of an electronic monitoring device.Section 622. Regulations.The department may, in consultation with the Department of Health, representatives of in-home supportive care providers and other aging advocates, promulgate regulations to implement this subarticle.Section 623. Temporary regulations.(a) Authority.--In order to facilitate the prompt implementation of this subarticle, the department may promulgate temporary regulations that shall expire no later than three years following the publication of the temporary regulations. The department may promulgate temporary regulations not subject to:(1) Section 612 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929.(2) Sections 201, 202, 203, 204 and 205 of the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.769, No.240), referred to as the Commonwealth Documents Law.20250HB1309PN1503 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) Sections 204(b) and 301(10) of the act of October 15, 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the Commonwealth Attorneys Act.(4) The act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act.(b) Expiration.--The authority of the department to adopt temporary regulations under subsection (a) shall expire two years after the effective date of this section. Regulations adopted after this period shall be promulgated as provided by law before the expiration of the temporary regulations under subsection (a).Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1309PN1503 - 7 - 123456789101112